District of Columbia statutes.
34-302.01

Rule for purchases of distribution transformers.

The Commission shall adopt a rule in accordance with § 8-1771.06.

Mar. 4, 1913, ch. 50, § 8, par. 56A
as added Dec. 11, 2007, D.C. Law 17-64, § 8, 54 DCR 10964